apertium-sme-sma.sma.lexc
LEXICON NUMBERLIKE
 gellie+Num+Sg:gell           N_IE_SG ; ! as sme máŋga
gellie+Num+Sg+Ine+Attr:gelle%>ne # ;
gellie+Num+Sg+Ela+Attr:gelle%>de              # ;


! A final section with some isolated numeral expresssions !
! ------------------------------------------------------- !


LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP                        !^C^
 ½+Num+Use/Circ:½ # ;                                 !
 ¹+Num+Use/Circ:¹ # ;                                 !
 ²+Num+Use/Circ:² # ;                                 !
 ³+Num+Use/Circ:³ # ;                                 !
 ¼+Num+Use/Circ:¼ # ;                                 !
¾+Num:¾ # ;


LEXICON COLLECTIVE    !Some collective numbers that do not fit in anywhere else
gööktege+Num+Coll:göökteg ORDTAGODD ;
golmege+Num+Coll:golmeg  ORDTAGODD ;
gåalmege+Num+Coll:gåalmag  ORDTAGODD ;
njealjege+Num+Coll:njealjag  ORDTAGODD ;
vïjhtege+Num+Coll:vïjhteg  ORDTAGODD ;
govhtege+Num+Coll:govhteg  ORDTAGODD ;
tjïjhtjege+Num+Coll:tjïjhtjeg  ORDTAGODD ;
gaaktsege+Num+Coll:gaaktsag  ORDTAGODD ;
uktsege+Num+Coll:uktsieg  ORDTAGODD ;
låhkege+Num+Coll:låhkag  ORDTAGODD ;

LEXICON 2TO9LUHKIE
göökte# LUHKIE- ;
golme# LUHKIE- ;
njieljie# LUHKIE- ;
njielje# LUHKIE- ;
nieljie# LUHKIE- ;
nielje# LUHKIE- ;
vïjhte# LUHKIE- ;
govhte# LUHKIE- ;
tjïjhtje# LUHKIE- ;
gaektsie# LUHKIE- ;
uktsie# LUHKIE- ;

LEXICON 2TO9TJUETIE
göökte# GTJUETIE ;
golme# GTJUETIE ;
njieljie# GTJUETIE ;
njielje# GTJUETIE ;
nieljie# GTJUETIE ;
nielje# GTJUETIE ;
vïjhte# GTJUETIE ;
govhte# GTJUETIE ;
tjïjhtje# GTJUETIE ;
gaektsie# GTJUETIE ;
uktsie# GTJUETIE ;

LEXICON GTJUETIE
tjuetie LUHKIEF ;
tjuetie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
tjuetie# AKTEF ;
tjuetie# 2TO9F ;
tjuetie+Num+Sg+Nom:tjuetie FINAL1 ;
tjuetie:tjuet NUMTAGie ;
tjuatede+A+Ord:tjuatad ORDTAGODD ;
nïmme LUHKIEF ;
nïmme# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
nïmme# AKTEF ;
nïmme# 2TO9F ;
nïmme:nïmm NUMTAGe ;
nymme LUHKIEF ;
nymme# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
nymme# AKTEF ;
nymme# 2TO9F ;
nymme:nymm NUMTAGe ;
nomme LUHKIEF ;
nomme# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
nomme# AKTEF ;
nomme# 2TO9F ;
nomme:nomm NUMTAGe ;
stoere#luhkie# LUHKIEF ;
stoere#luhkie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
stoere#luhkie# AKTEF ;
stoere#luhkie# 2TO9F ;
stoere#luhkie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoere#luhkie FINAL1 ;
stoere#luhkie:stoere#luhk NUMTAGie ;
stoerre#luhkie# LUHKIEF ;
stoerre#luhkie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
stoerre#luhkie# AKTEF ;
stoerre#luhkie# 2TO9F ;
stoerre#luhkie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoerre#luhkie FINAL1 ;
stoerre#luhkie:stoerre#luhk NUMTAGie ;

LEXICON TJUETIE
tjuetie+Num+Sg+Nom:tjuetie FINAL1 ;
tjuetie:tjuet NUMTAGie ;
tjuetie# LUHKIEF ;
tjuetie# LUHKIE- ;
tjuetie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
tjuetie# AKTEF ;
tjuetie# 2TO9F ;
tjuatede+A+Ord:tjuatad ORDTAGODD ;
akte#tjuetie+Num+Sg+Nom:akte#tjuetie FINAL1 ;
akte#tjuetie:akte#tjuet NUMTAGie ;
akte#tjuetie# LUHKIEF ;
akte#tjuetie# LUHKIE- ;
akte#tjuetie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
akte#tjuetie# AKTEF ;
akte#tjuetie# 2TO9F ;
nïmme:nïmm NUMTAGe ;
nïmme# LUHKIEF ;
nïmme# LUHKIE- ;
nïmme# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
nïmme# AKTEF ;
nïmme# 2TO9F ;
nymme:nymm NUMTAGe ;
nymme# LUHKIEF ;
nymme# LUHKIE- ;
nymme# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
nymme# AKTEF ;
nymme# 2TO9F ;
nomme:nomm NUMTAGe ;
nomme# LUHKIEF ;
nomme# LUHKIE- ;
nomme# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
nomme# AKTEF ;
nomme# 2TO9F ;
stoere#luhkie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoere#luhkie FINAL1 ;
stoere#luhkie:stoere#luhk NUMTAGie ;
stoere#luhkie# LUHKIEF ;
stoere#luhkie# LUHKIE- ;
stoere#luhkie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
stoere#luhkie# AKTEF ;
stoere#luhkie# 2TO9F ;
stoerre#luhkie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoerre#luhkie FINAL1 ;
stoerre#luhkie:stoerre#luhk NUMTAGie ;
stoerre#luhkie# LUHKIEF ;
stoerre#luhkie# LUHKIE- ;
stoerre#luhkie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
stoerre#luhkie# AKTEF ;
stoerre#luhkie# 2TO9F ;




  






                  
                                      
!LEXICON NUMERALCOMPOUNDS  ! numeral as first part 
! NAMÁK ;   ! tuvsánjienat, logigielat, etc. 
! SASJ ; 
! NounSecond ;! golmmačiegahas
! geardásaš:geardás DABALAS ;   
! !tuvsán#geardásaš 
! jahkásaš:jahkás DABALAS ; 





! Imprecise numbers
! -----------------

!LEXICON num-imprecise

! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !


! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation
ITRAB ;
TRNUMAB ;
TRAB ;

! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-dot-one.

LEXICON ab ! No POS, don't know what pos
ab-nodot ;
ab-dot ;

! Some of these POS
!LEXICON ab-noun-adj
! ab-noun ;
! ab-adj ;

LEXICON ab-dot-noun-adj
ab-dot-noun ;
ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-noun
ab-nodot-noun ;
ab-dot-noun ;

LEXICON ab-adj
ab-nodot-adj ;
ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-adv
ab-nodot-adv ;
ab-dot-adv ;

LEXICON ab-num
ab-nodot-num ;
ab-dot-num;

!still not in use.
!LEXICON ab-cc
!ab-nodot-cc ;
!ab-dot-cc ;


! Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun ! The bulk
+N+ABBR+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Acc:%>%:m # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Gen:%>%:n # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ill:%>%:an # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ine:%>%:sne # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ela:%>%:ste # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Com:%>%:ine # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ess:%>%:ine # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR:%>%- RAbbr ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adj
!+ABBR:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Acc:%>%:m # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Gen:%>%:n # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ill:%>%:an # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ine:%>%:sne # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ela:%>%:ste # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Com:%>%:ine # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ess:%>%:ine # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR:%>%- RAbbr ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adv
+Adv+ABBR:%> # ; ! Adv without case, consider this.

LEXICON ab-nodot-num
+Num+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+Num+ABBR:%>%- RAbbr ;


! Still not in use.
!LEXICON ab-nodot-cc
! +ABBR+CC:%> # ; ! no period, that is.

! noun the default POS
LEXICON ab-nodot ! default
+N+ABBR+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR:%>%- RAbbr ;


! Here come POS and Case tags, with the period added.

LEXICON ab-dot ! Default
! +ABBR:%.%> # ;
+N+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ;
+N+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-noun ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ;
+N+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ;
+N+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-adj ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ;
+A+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ;
+A+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-adv ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
+Adv+ABBR:%.%> # ; ! Adv without case.

LEXICON ab-dot-num ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ;
+N+ABBR+Num+Nom:%.%> # ;

LEXICON ITRAB
2p+Use/Circ:2p ab; ! !
3p+Use/Circ:3p ab; ! !
abess:abess ab-noun ;
abl ab-noun ;
abstr ab-adj ;
adess:adess ab-noun ;
adj ab-noun ;
can ab-dot-noun ;
adv ab-noun ;
advl ab-noun ;
affekt ab ;
akk ab-noun ;
akk/gen+Use/Circ:akk/gen ab-noun; !
akt ab ;
all ab-noun ;
anat ab-dot-adj ; !anatomalaš !
att ab ;
attr ab ;
bfr ab-nodot ; !
biol ab-dot-adj ; !
bot ab-dot-adj ; !
r ab-dot-adj ; !
c ab ; !
c/o+Use/Circ:c/o ab-nodot; ! !
ca ab-dot ; !
cal ab ; !
cd ab-nodot-noun ; !
cg ab-nodot-noun ; !
cl ab-nodot-noun ; !
cm ab-nodot-noun ; !
cos ab-nodot-noun ; !
vt ab-nodot-noun ;
cot ab-nodot-noun ; !
d ab ; !
daa ab-nodot ; !
dB ab-nodot ; !
d.d ab-dot ; !
ded ab-dot-noun ; !
dem:dem ab ;
dg ab-nodot ; !
dl ab-nodot-noun ; !
dm²+Use/Circ:dm² ab-nodot-noun; !
dm³ ab-nodot-noun ;
do ab-dot ; !
dus ab-dot ; !
e ab ; !
ess ab-noun ;
etc ab-dot-adv ; !
f ab ; !
f ab-dot ; !
fac ab ; !
ff ab ; !
fin ab ;
fr ab ; !
g ab ; !
g.b ab-nodot-noun ; !
gen ab-noun ;
geogr ab-dot-adj ; !geografiijas !
geom ab-dot-adj ; !geometrihkala !š
ger ab-dot ;
gl ab-dot ; !
ha ab-nodot ;
h ab ; !
hg ab-nodot-noun ; !
hl ab-nodot-noun ; !
Hz ab-nodot-noun ;
i ab ; !
ib ab-nodot ; !
ibid ab-nodot ; !
ill ab-noun ;
imp ab-noun ;
impers ab-dot ;
impf ab ;
imprt ab-noun ;
ind ab-noun ;
inf ab ;
ing ab-dot-noun ; !
instr ab ;
interr ab-dot-adj ;
intr ab-dot-adj ;
j.d ab-dot ; !
j.e ab-dot ; !
jd ab-dot ; !
je ab-dot ; !
j.i ab-dot ;
jna ab-adv ; !ja nu ain !
j.n.v ab-dot-adv ; !ja nav vijdábun !
jnv ab-adv ; !
jur ab-dot-adj ; !juridihkalaš !
jv ab ; !
kg ab-nodot-noun ;
kHz ab-nodot-noun ; !
km ab-nodot-noun ; ! kg3 or kg, that's the question.
km² ab-nodot-noun ;
km³ ab-nodot-noun ;
km2 ab-nodot-noun ;
kom:kom ab ;
komp ab ;
kond ab ;
konj ab ;
konkr ab-dot-adj; !konkrehta
Kr ab-noun ; !
kV ab-nodot ;
kvm ab-nodot ;
kl ab-nodot ;
kW ab-nodot-noun ;
l ab-noun ;
Lohk ab-dot ;
m ab-noun ;
m.fl ab-dot ;
matem ab-dot-adj ; !matematihkalaš
mg ab-nodot-noun ;
milj ab-num ;
miljo ab-dot-num ;
mill ab-nodot-num ; !But this is also used with dot
mm ab-nodot-noun ;
mm³ ab-nodot-noun ;
mrd ab-num ;
mV ab-nodot ;
mW ab-nodot ;
m³ ab-nodot-noun ;
nom:nom ab-noun ;
o.Kr ab-dot-adv ; !Does this exist?
od.prp ab-dot ;
oKr ab-dot-adv ;
osd ab-dot ;
part ab-dot-noun ; !partihkkal
pf ab-dot ;
pl ab-dot ;
pot ab-noun ;
pres ab ;
pret ab ;
prf ab-dot ;
pron ab-dot-noun ;
prt ab ;
prv ab-dot ;
pst ab ;
pvc ab-nodot ;
refl ab-adj ;
relat ab-dot-adj ; !relatiiva
ru ab-dot ;
sg ab-dot ;
spd ab-dot-noun ;
subj ab-noun ;
tabl ab-dot-noun ;
tan ab-noun ; !tangeansa
á ab ; !
LEXICON TRAB
1.aman+Use/Circ:1.aman ab-dot; ! !1.amanuensis
Adr ab-dot-noun ; !Adreassa
adr ab-dot-noun ; !adreassa
biht ab-dot ; !
bnr ab-dot-noun ;
cand.real ab-dot-noun ; !
Chr ab-dot ; !Christian
dbm ab-dot-noun ; !
dm:dm ab-nodot-noun ; !desimehtar
dr ab-dot-noun ; !doktor
dr.theol ab-dot-noun ; !
et ab-nodot ; !
alii ab-nodot-noun ;
min ab-nodot-noun ;
pers ab-dot-noun ;
kat ab-dot-noun ;
lc ab-nodot-noun ;
lat ab-dot-noun ;
lix ab-nodot-noun ;
miner ab-dot-noun ;
mp ab-nodot-noun ;
obsol ab-dot-noun ;
pa ab-dot-noun ;
pic ab-noun ;
pm ab-dot-noun ;
pt ab-dot-noun ;
pta ab-nodot-noun ;
sfr ab-nodot-noun ;
rbl ab-nodot-noun ;
rek ab-dot-noun ;
vulg ab-dot-noun ;
dual ab-nodot-noun ;
ea ab ; !
ea.ea ab ; ! 15 %- ea.ea without final dot.!
Edv ab-dot-noun ; !Edvard
eren ab-dot-adj ; !
ex ab ; !
eŋg ab-dot-noun-adj; !
fenr ab-dot-noun ; !
genr ab-dot-noun ; !
germ ab-dot ; !
h.r.adv ab-dot ; !
i.s ab-dot ;
kapt ab-dot-noun ; !
ltn ab-dot-noun ; !
Luk ab-noun ; !Lukas
mag ab-dot ; !
milj ab-dot-num ; !
ms ab-dot ; !
oblt ab-dot ; !
Od.prp ab-dot-noun ; !Odeldikkeproposišuvdna
Od ab-nodot-noun ; !Odelstinget
Ot.prop.nr ab-noun ; !Odelstingsproposisjon nummer
Ot.prp.nr ab-noun ; !Odelstingsproposisjon nummer
Oth.prp ab-noun ; !
overs ab-dot ; !oversatt, oversetter
pharm ab-dot-adj ; !
polit ab-dot-adj ; !
priv ab-dot-adj ; !
pro ab ; !
prp ab-dot ; !
psyk ab-dot-adj ; !
res.kap ab-dot-noun ; !
resipr ab-dot-adj ; !resiprohka TRAB or ITRAB?
Sd ab-noun ; !
Sd.prp ab-noun ; !
St ab-noun ; !
St.died ab-noun ; !
St.meld.nr ab-noun ; !
St.prp ab-noun ; !Stortingsproposisjon
su ab-dot-adv ; ! sullii
tlf ab-dot-noun ;
urál ab-dot ; !urálalaš
F ab-dot-noun ;
J ab-noun ;
N ab-noun ;
R ab-noun ;
T ab-dot-noun ;
W ab-noun ;
Å ab-dot-noun ;
